Utah statutes.
10-3b-203.   Council in a council-mayor form of government.

(1)  The council in a municipality operating under a council-mayor form of government:

(a)  shall:

(i)  by ordinance, provide for the manner in which:

(A)  municipal property is bought, sold, traded, encumbered, or otherwise transferred; and

(B)  a subdivision or annexation is approved, disapproved, or otherwise regulated;

(ii)  pass ordinances, appropriate funds, and review municipal administration;

(iii)  perform all duties that the law imposes on the council; and

(iv)  elect one of its members to be the chair of the council;

(b)  may:

(i)  adopt an ordinance, to be known as the municipal administrative code:

(A)  dividing the municipality's administrative service into departments, divisions, and bureaus; and

(B)  defining the functions and duties of each department, division, and bureau;

(ii)  adopt an ordinance:

(A)  creating, consolidating, or abolishing departments, divisions, and bureaus; and

(B)  defining or altering the functions and duties of each department, division, and bureau;

(iii)  notwithstanding Subsection (1)(c)(iii), make suggestions or recommendations to a subordinate of the mayor;

(iv) (A)  notwithstanding Subsection (1)(c), appoint a committee of council members or citizens to conduct an investigation into:

(I)  an officer, department, or agency of the municipality; or

(II)  any other matter relating to the welfare of the municipality; and

(B)  delegate to an appointed committee powers of inquiry that the council considers necessary;

(v)  make and enforce any additional rule or regulation for the government of the council, the preservation of order, and the transaction of the council's business that the council considers necessary; and

(vi)  take any action allowed under Section 10-8-84; and

(c)  may not:

(i)  direct or request, other than in writing, the appointment of a person to or the removal of a person from an executive municipal office;

(ii)  interfere in any way with an executive officer's performance of the officer's duties; or

(iii)  publicly or privately give orders to a subordinate of the mayor.

(2)  A member of a council in a municipality operating under the council-mayor form of government may not have any other compensated employment with the municipality.

